Utah statutes.
7-14-3.   Information an institution may furnish.

Any institution doing business in the state may report to any other financial institution, or credit reporting agency the following: (1) that an account maintained to effect third party payment transactions has been closed out by the institution, the reasons therefor, and the identity of the depositor or account holder; (2) upon the request of another financial institution any other information in the files of the institution relating to the credit experience of the reporting institution with respect to a particular person as to whom inquiry is made; and (3) any information concerning attempted or potential activity to defraud a financial institution or to obtain funds from a financial institution by fraudulent or other unlawful means or other information relating to individuals sought by law enforcement authorities for alleged violations of criminal laws.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

